Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1704
Person, defined.

Person shall mean any individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, or business entity.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 379.